Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2704.43
Industrial machinery and equipment; reciprocal exemption.

Sales and use taxes shall not be imposed on the gross receipts from the sale, lease, or rental of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of purchases of industrial machinery and equipment, including parts for repairs, by another state or a political subdivision of another state if the other state provides a similar reciprocal exemption for this state and political subdivisions of this state.

Laws 2003, LB 168, § 2.